Washington statutes.
RCW 36.48.070

County finance committee—Approval of investment policy and debt policy—Rules.

The county treasurer, the county auditor, and the chair of the county legislative authority, ex officio, shall constitute the county finance committee. The county treasurer shall act as chair of the committee and the county auditor as secretary thereof. The committee shall keep a full and complete record of all its proceedings in appropriate books of record and all such records and all correspondence relating to the committee shall be kept in the office of the county auditor and shall be open to public inspection. The committee shall approve county investment policy and a debt policy and shall make appropriate rules and regulations for the carrying out of the provisions of RCW 36.48.010 through 36.48.060, not inconsistent with law.

[ 1999 c 18 s 5; 1991 c 245 s 11; 1963 c 4 s 36.48.070. Prior: 1933 ex.s. c 45 s 2; RRS s 5567-1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 18 s 5: "Section 5 of this act takes effect January 1, 2000." [ 1999 c 18 s 10.]